Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 47.56.030 and 2025 c 417 s 1220 are each amended to read as follows:(1) Except as permitted under chapter 47.47 or 47.46 RCW:(a)(i) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the department of transportation shall have full charge of the planning, analysis, and construction of all toll bridges and other toll facilities including the Washington state ferries, and the operation and maintenance thereof.(ii) If a federal, state, or local government authority issues a level 3 or "go now" notice of evacuation for people to leave an area that encompasses multiple properties, the department of transportation shall immediately suspend the imposition of any tolls on a facility that could be reasonably construed to be an evacuation route, in the event of an emergency. Such suspension must continue until the department of transportation determines the suspension is no longer necessary to facilitate an evacuation.(b) The transportation commission shall determine and establish the tolls and charges thereon.(c) Unless otherwise delegated, and subject to RCW 47.56.820, the department shall have full charge of planning, analysis, and design of all toll facilities. The department may conduct the planning, analysis, and design of toll facilities as necessary to support the legislature's consideration of toll authorization.(d) The department shall utilize and administer toll collection systems that are simple, unified, and interoperable. To the extent practicable, the department shall avoid the use of toll booths. The department shall set the statewide standards and protocols for all toll facilities within the state, including those authorized by local authorities.(e) Except as provided in this section, the department shall proceed with the construction of such toll bridges and other facilities and the approaches thereto by contract in the manner of state highway construction immediately upon there being made available funds for such work and shall prosecute such work to completion as rapidly as practicable. The department is authorized to negotiate contracts for any amount without bid under (e)(i) and (ii) of this subsection:(i) Emergency contracts, in order to make repairs to ferries or ferry terminal facilities or removal of such facilities whenever continued use of ferries or ferry terminal facilities constitutes a real or immediate danger to the traveling public or precludes prudent use of such ferries or facilities; and(ii) Single source contracts for vessel dry dockings, when there is clearly and legitimately only one available bidder to conduct dry dock-related work for a specific class or classes of vessels. The contracts may be entered into for a single vessel dry docking or for multiple vessel dry dockings for a period not to exceed two years.(f) Any new vessel planning, construction, purchase, analysis, or design work must be consistent with RCW 47.60.810, except as otherwise provided in RCW 47.60.826.(2) The department shall proceed with the procurement of materials, supplies, services, and equipment needed for the support, maintenance, and use of a ferry, ferry terminal, or other facility operated by Washington state ferries, in accordance with chapter 43.19 RCW except as follows:(a) When the secretary of the department of transportation determines in writing that the use of invitation for bid is either not practicable or not advantageous to the state and it may be necessary to make competitive evaluations, including technical or performance evaluations among acceptable proposals to complete the contract award, a contract may be entered into by use of a competitive sealed proposals method, and a formal request for proposals solicitation. Such formal request for proposals solicitation shall include a functional description of the needs and requirements of the state and the significant factors.(b) When purchases are made through a formal request for proposals solicitation the contract shall be awarded to the responsible proposer whose competitive sealed proposal is determined in writing to be the most advantageous to the state taking into consideration price and other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposals. No significant factors may be used in evaluating a proposal that are not specified in the request for proposals. Factors that may be considered in evaluating proposals include but are not limited to: Price; maintainability; reliability; commonality; performance levels; life-cycle cost if applicable under this section; cost of transportation or delivery; delivery schedule offered; installation cost; cost of spare parts; availability of parts and service offered; and the following:(i) The ability, capacity, and skill of the proposer to perform the contract or provide the service required;(ii) The character, integrity, reputation, judgment, experience, and efficiency of the proposer;(iii) Whether the proposer can perform the contract within the time specified;(iv) The quality of performance of previous contracts or services;(v) The previous and existing compliance by the proposer with laws relating to the contract or services;(vi) Objective, measurable criteria defined in the request for proposal. These criteria may include, but are not limited to, items such as discounts, delivery costs, maintenance services costs, installation costs, and transportation costs; and(vii) Such other information as may be secured having a bearing on the decision to award the contract.(c) When purchases are made through a request for proposal process, proposals received shall be evaluated based on the evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposal. When issuing a request for proposal for the procurement of propulsion equipment or systems that include an engine, the request for proposal must specify the use of a life-cycle cost analysis that includes an evaluation of fuel efficiency. When a life-cycle cost analysis is used, the life-cycle cost of a proposal shall be given at least the same relative importance as the initial price element specified in the request of proposal documents. The department may reject any and all proposals received. If the proposals are not rejected, the award shall be made to the proposer whose proposal is most advantageous to the department, considering price and the other evaluation factors set forth in the request for proposal.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act takes effect October 1, 2026.--- END ---